Washington statutes.
RCW 43.59.170

Child restraint systems in motor vehicles—Information and education.

(1) The Washington traffic safety commission shall produce and disseminate informational and educational materials explaining the proper use of child restraint systems in motor vehicles, the safety risks of not properly using child restraint systems in motor vehicles, where assistance on the proper installation and use of child restraint systems in motor vehicles can be obtained, and the legal penalties for not properly using child restraint systems in motor vehicles.

(2) As used in this section, "child restraint system" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 46.61.687(6).

[ 2019 c 59 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2019 c 59: See note following RCW 46.61.687.